Maine, session 132, LD618.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 26 MRSA §774, sub-§2, ¶F, as amended by PL 1993, c. 434, §4, is further
amended to read:
F. Between the hours of 7 9 p.m. and 7 a.m. except during summer vacation, when that
minor may not work between the hours of 9 10 p.m. and 7 a.m.